Hawaii statutes.
[§211F-13] Limitations on debt owed to
corporation. Not more than $5,000,000 in financial assistance, excluding
rights and royalties under a venture capital agreement, shall be provided to
any one enterprise at any time. The direct investments of the corporation
shall not exceed five per cent of the assets of the corporation, excluding
rights and royalties under a venture capital agreement, provided that by a
two-thirds vote of the board this amount may be increased to a limit of
twenty-five per cent of the total assets of the corporation. [L 1990, c 110, pt
of §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next